Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-709
Telephone lines; notice of widening of roads; contents.

The notice required by section 86-708 shall state the nature and location of the work to be done and the date on which such work is scheduled to commence. In the event of any change in the scheduled time of starting such work, notice of such change shall be given as soon as practicable.

Laws 1957, c. 400, § 2, p. 1369;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-335;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 414.